src/morphology/stems/suffixes.lexc
säätöinen+A:säätöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säätöisesti+Adv:säätöisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
tahkoinen+A:tahkoi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
tahoinen+A:tahoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tahtinen+A:tahti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tahtoinen+A:tahtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tahtoisuus+A:tahtoisuu NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
taipeinen+A:taipei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
taittoinen+A:taittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
taittoisuus+A:taittoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
takkinen+A:takki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tapahtumainen+A:tapahtumai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tapauksinen+A:tapauksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tarmoinen+A:tarmoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tarpeinen+A:tarpei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tavuinen+A:tavui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tehoisesti+Adv:tehoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
teinen+A:tei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tekijäinen+A:tekijäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tekiäiset+A:tekiäi@U.PLURALE.TANTUM@     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
tekoinen+A:tekoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tekoisesti+Adv:tekoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
tekoisuus+A:tekoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
tekstinen+A:teksti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tempoinen+A:tempoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
teriöinen+A:teriöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
teräinen+A:teräi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tieteinen+A:tietei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tiivisteinen+A:tiivistei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
toiminen+A:toimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
toimintainen+A:toimintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tolkulla+Adv:tolkulla  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
torninen+A:torni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tukkainen+A:tukkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tulkintainen+A:tulkintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tulkintaisuus+A:tulkintaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
tuloinen+A:tuloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tuloksinen+A:tuloksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tumainen+A:tumai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tunnelmainen+A:tunnelmai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tuntoinen+A:tuntoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tuntoisesti+Adv:tuntoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
tuntoisuus+A:tuntoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
turpainen+A:turpai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tuumainen+A:tuumai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
tyvinen+A:tyvi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
töinen+A:töi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ulotteinen+A:ulottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
uskoinen+A:uskoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
uskoisesti+Adv:uskoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
uskoisuus+A:uskoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vaatteinen+A:vaattei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vahvikkeinen+A:vahvikkei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vahvisteinen+A:vahvistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaiheinen+A:vaihei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaihteinen+A:vaihtei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaikutteinen+A:vaikuttei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaikutteisesti+Adv:vaikutteisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
vaikutteisuus+A:vaikutteisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vaikutuksinen+A:vaikutuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vainuinen+A:vainui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaippainen+A:vaippai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaistoinen+A:vaistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vaistoisesti+Adv:vaistoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
vaistoisuus+A:vaistoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
valintainen+A:valintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
valkuaisinen+A:valkuaisi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
valmisteinen+A:valmistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
valtainen+A:valtai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
valtaisesti+Adv:valtaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
varaisesti+Adv:varaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
varaisuus+A:varaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
varpainen+A:varpai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
varsinen+A:varsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vartaloinen+A:vartaloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vartinen+A:varti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vastuinen+A:vastui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vastuisesti+Adv:vastuisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
vastuksinen+A:vastuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vatsainen+A:vatsai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vauhtinen+A:vauhti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
verkkoinen+A:verkkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
viikkoinen+A:viikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
viiksinen+A:viiksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
viivainen+A:viivai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
viivaisesti+Adv:viivaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
viivaisuus+A:viivaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vikainen+A:vikai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vikaisuus+A:vikaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vireinen+A:virei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
vireisyys+N:vireisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
virheinen+A:virhei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
viritteinen+A:virittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
virvilä+N:virvil NOUN_HÄKKYRÄ  ;
vitamiininen+A:vitamiini  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
voimainen+A:voimai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
voimaisesti+Adv:voimaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
voimaisuus+A:voimaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
vointinen+A:vointi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vointisuus+A:vointisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
voipa+A:voi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
voittoinen+A:voittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
voittoisesti+Adv:voittoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
vooninkinen+A:vooninki  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
vuokrainen+A:vuokrai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vuorinen+A:vuori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vuoroinen+A:vuoroi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vuorolainen+A:vuorolai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vuotias+A:vuotia ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
vuotinen+A:vuoti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
vyötäröinen+A:vyötäröi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
väestöinen+A:väestöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
väestöllinen+N:väestölli     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
väkinen+A:väki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
välinen+A:väli     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
välitteinen+A:välittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
välityksinen+A:välityksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
välkkeinen+A:välkkei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
väritteinen+A:värittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
värityksinen+A:värityksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
yksikköinen+A:yksikköi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ymmärteinen+A:ymmärtei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ymmärteisyys+N:ymmärteisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
älyinen+A:älyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
älyisyys+N:älyisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
äänisesti+Adv:äänisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
ääntöinen+A:ääntöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
